Wisconsin, session 2025, AB393.
do enact as follows:AB393,11Section 1. 343.12 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:AB393,2,62343.12 (3m) (a) A person whose school bus endorsement is cancelled for 3medical reasons that would require a medical review board exception to allow the 4person to continue operating a school bus may reinstate their school bus 5endorsement by providing the department documentation prepared by a health 6care provider stating that the person is able to resume operating a school bus. AB393,2,97(b) Upon receipt of documentation under par. (a), the department shall 8reinstate the person’s school bus endorsement, which shall remain valid unless the 9reviewing board under s. 343.16 (5) (b) determines the reinstatement is improper. AB393,210Section 2. 343.16 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB393,4,311343.16 (5) (b) Whenever the department receives the results of a special 12examination required under this subsection, the department shall give fair 13consideration to the recommendation of the examining person or agency together 14with other evidence in determining if it is in the interest of public safety to issue, 15renew, deny or cancel a license. If a license is denied or canceled by the department 16after a special examination as provided in par. (a), such denial or cancellation shall 1be reviewed by a reviewing board upon written request of the applicant filed with 2the department within 10 days after receipt of notice of such denial or cancellation. 3Notice of denial or cancellation shall be in writing and contain specific reasons. The 4notice shall contain a statement that the applicant has 10 days within which to file 5a written request with the department for review of the department’s decision by 6the reviewing board. The applicant shall have the right to appear personally before 7the review board, to present witnesses and additional information, and to be 8represented by counsel. The department’s representative may administer oaths, 9issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant 10documents and may require a reexamination of the applicant. No law enforcement 11officer or other witness produced by the applicant to testify on the applicant’s 12behalf shall be paid a witness fee nor shall any law enforcement officer called to 13appear for the department be paid any witness fee. A record including the 14recommendations of the board shall be made of the proceeding. If a license is 15denied or canceled, the applicant shall be given specific reasons in writing. Review 16boards shall consist of the department’s representative and at least 2 members 17appointed by the secretary from a list of physicians licensed to practice medicine in 18this state and a list of optometrists licensed to practice optometry physicians, 19physician assistants, advanced practice nurses, and optometrists licensed to 20practice in this state. Optometrists shall be limited to reviewing cases concerning 21vision only. In cases concerning mental disability or disease at least one of the 22physicians shall have specialized training in psychiatry. In cases concerning 23seizure disorders at least one of the physicians shall have specialized training in 24neurology. The members of the board shall receive the per diem and expenses 1provided in s. 15.08 (7) which shall be charged to the appropriation under s. 20.395 2(5) (cq). A decision of the department based on the recommendation of a reviewing 3board is subject to judicial review under s. 343.40.AB393,34Section 3. 343.20 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB393,4,125343.20 (1) (c) The department may, by rule, require any person who is issued 6an operator’s license that is valid for a period of more than 2 years to demonstrate 7continuing qualifications to hold a license under this chapter at 2-year intervals of 8not less than 2 years. The rules may include, without limitation, requiring 9examination under s. 343.16 (6) (a) or requiring current medical certification under 10s. 343.16 (5). The department rules shall require cancellation or suspension of the 11license for noncompliance and shall permit surrender of the operator’s license 12under s. 343.265.AB393,413Section 4. 343.20 (1) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:AB393,4,1814343.20 (1) (cm) The department shall require any person who is 70 years of 15age or older and holds a school bus endorsement to file a medical certification 16annually and demonstrate their continuing ability to hold a license under this 17chapter at 4-year intervals, as measured from the date of their preceding 18examination.AB393,4,1919